Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.220

Sale of property before judgment.

If any property attached be perishable or in danger of serious and immediate waste or decay, the sheriff shall sell the same in the manner in which such property is sold on execution. Whenever it shall be made to appear satisfactorily to the court or judge that the interest of the parties to the action will be subserved by a sale of any attached property, the court or judge may order such property to be sold in the same manner as like property is sold under execution. Such order shall be made only upon notice to the adverse party or that party's attorney in case such party shall have been personally served with a summons in the action.

[ 1987 c 442 s 822; 1957 c 51 s 2; 1886 p 42 s 16; RRS s 662. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.160.]